Utah statutes.
77-28-4.   Board of Pardons and Parole -- Authority to hold hearings.
The Board of Pardons and Parole is hereby authorized and directed to hold such
hearings as may be requested by any other party state pursuant to Article IV
(f) of the Western Interstate Corrections Compact.  The board is further
authorized to travel to any state who is a party to the compact to which an
inmate is sent for confinement, for the purpose of holding any hearing to
which an inmate is entitled by the laws of Utah.
